Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1720
Public-offering statement; material change; amend or supplement.

The developer shall amend or supplement the public-offering statement to report any material change in the information required by sections 76-1713 and 76-1714. As to any exchange program, the developer shall use the current written materials that are supplied to it for distribution to the time-share interval owners as it is received.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 20.